Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-2918
Herd or flock, defined.

Herd or flock means one or more groups of livestock under common ownership or supervision, maintained on common ground for any purpose, or which are geographically separated but which have an interchange of livestock or equipment.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 18.
November 14, 2020